Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3077.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 2604, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2604. A. Subject to the availability of funds, an
amount equivalent to the nonguaranteed resident tuition and fifty
percent (50%) of fees for which an eligible Oklahoma Higher Learning
Access Program student is obligated at an institution of The
Oklahoma State System of Higher Education shall be awarded by
allocation from the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Trust Fund.
B. Subject to the availability of funds, for each eligible
Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program student enrolled at a
Req. No. 15986 Page 1

priv ate institution of higher learning located within this state and
accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of this title, the Oklahoma
State Regents for Higher Education shall award from the Oklahoma
Higher Learning Access Trust Fund an amount equivalent to the amount
of resident tuition for which the student would be eligible and
fifty percent (50%) of fees for which the student would be obligated
to pay if the student were enrolled in a comparable program at a
comparable institution of The Oklahoma State System of Higher
Education. Comparability shall be determined by the State Regents.
C. Subject to the availability of funds, an amount equivalent
to the tuition and fifty percent (50%) of fees for any eligible
Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program student enrolled in a public
postsecondary vocational-technical program or course for the purpose
set forth in Section 2602 of this title shall be awarded by
allocation from the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Trust Fund.
Provided, such allocation shall not exceed the amount a student
would have received for comparable enrollment at a two-year
institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education.
D. 1. An award allowed by this section shall not be allowed
for courses or other postsecondary units taken in excess of the
requirements for completion of a baccalaureate program or taken more
than five (5) years after the student's first semester of
postsecondary enrollment. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education may award the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program
Req. No. 15986 Page 2

bene fits for courses of postsecondary units taken more than five (5)
years after the student's first semester of postsecondary enrollment
only in hardship circumstances; provided, however, no Oklahoma
Higher Learning Access Program participant may receive benefits
beyond a cumulative time period of five (5) years.
2. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education may award
the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefits for a student's
first semester or other academic unit of postsecondary enrollment
taken more than three (3) years after the student graduates from
high school or completes an educational program equivalent to high
school graduation as authorized in subsection A of Section 2603 of
this title or after the student turns twenty-one (21) years of age
as authorized in subsection B of Section 2603 of this title if the
student is a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, the
Reserve Corps of the Armed Forces of the United States, or the
Oklahoma National Guard, and is ordered to active duty or active
duty for special work or training and due to the duty commitment the
student is unable to enroll prior to the end of the three-year
period or before the student reaches twenty-one (21) years of age.
The period shall be extended by the length of the term of duty.
3. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall
establish a maximum limit on the number of courses or other
postsecondary units to which Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program
benefits will apply.
Req. No. 15986 Page 3

E. Benefits awarded under the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access
Program shall be awarded to all eligible applicants without any
limitation on the number of awards in any year other than the amount
of funds available for the program and the number of eligible
applicants. Subject to the provisions of subsection F of this
section, if funds are not sufficient to provide awards for all
eligible applicants, the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education
shall make awards on the basis of need. Provided, the Oklahoma
State Regents for Higher Education shall take into consideration
other grants and scholarships received by an eligible applicant when
making awards.
F. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education may, at the
time an award is made on behalf of an Oklahoma Higher Learning
Access Program student, set aside in the Oklahoma Higher Learning
Access Trust Fund funds for the full commitment made to such Higher
Learning Access Program student. For all academic years, students
who have previously received awards under the provisions of the
Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Act, Section 2601 et seq. of this
title, and who have continued at all times to fulfill the
requirements for eligibility to receive awards provided pursuant to
this program shall be given an absolute priority for continued
financial support by the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program
superior to any students who are applying for such benefits for the
first time.
Req. No. 15986 Page 4

G. Beginning with the 2018-2019 academic year, an award allowed
by this section shall not include an amount for payment of remedial
noncredit-earning courses taken by an eligible Oklahoma Higher
Learning Access Program student.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-15986 SW 01/26/26 Commented [1]: BDERIV













Req. No. 15986 Page 5